Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3951
Nebraska Dairy Industry Development
Board; created; members; qualifications.

The Nebraska Dairy
Industry Development Board is hereby created. Members of the board shall (1)
be residents of Nebraska, (2) be at least twenty-one years of age, (3) have
been actually engaged in the production of milk in this state for at least
five years, and (4) derive a substantial portion of their income from the
production of milk in Nebraska. Board
members shall be nominated and appointed as provided in sections 2-3951.01
to 2-3951.04.

Laws 1992, LB 275, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 836, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB70, § 1.